Massachusetts, session 194th, H4473.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION l. Notwithstanding sections 11, 15 and 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws,
the select board of the town of Arlington may cause to be placed upon the ballot at a town
election held in the year 2026 the following question:
“Shall the Select Board of the town be authorized to issue 2 additional licenses for the
sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises?
Yes______No______”
SECTION 2. If a majority of voters voting at the 2026 town election at which the above
question appears on the ballot vote “yes” on the question, then the select board of the town of
Arlington may issue 2 additional licenses for the sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk
of 2

on the premises, in addition to the 6 licenses that are currently authorized in the town of
Arlington for the sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises. The licenses
shall be subject to chapter 138 of the General Laws, except as provided in this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2